Louisiana, session 2026, HB298.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:43(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:43(A)(5) and
(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§43. Third degree rape
A. Third degree rape is a rape committed when the anal, oral, or vaginal
sexual intercourse is deemed to be without the lawful consent of a victim because it
is committed under any one or more of the following circumstances:
* * *
(5) When the victim is confined or detained in a correctional facility.
* * *
C. For purposes of this Section, "correctional facility" means any jail, prison,
penitentiary, juvenile institution, temporary holding center, or detention facility.
D. For all purposes, "simple rape" and "third degree rape" mean the offense
defined by the provisions of this Section and any reference to the crime of simple
rape is the same as a reference to the crime of third degree rape. Any act in violation
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1070 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 298
of the provisions of this Section committed on or after August 1, 2015, shall be
referred to as "third degree rape".